District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1219.52

Conditions of transfer; effective date.

Repealed.

Sept. 11, 1998, D.C. Law 12-144, § 30bb
as added Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-219, § 201(a)(4), 51 DCR 9142
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-287, § 101(b), 54 DCR 969
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 103(a), 55 DCR 1689
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 201(a)(4) of Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-586, November 1, 2004, 51 DCR 10681).